Utah statutes.
73-26-506.   Water charges.
The division shall set prices for the sale or lease of developed water
sufficient to:
(1)  recover the reimbursable construction and environmental mitigation costs
within the time period specified in Section 73-26-504 and pay for the interest
on those costs;
(2)  pay for operation and maintenance costs; and
(3)  accumulate an adequate reserve for repair and replacement.
